New York, session 2025-2026, S3932.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 3555 of the public health law, as 2 amended by chapter 194 of the laws of 2018, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 2. No owner, operator, or employee of a tanning facility shall permit 5 the use of an ultraviolet radiation device by a person under [eighteen] 6 twenty-one years of age. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00598-01-5